orthographica/firefox-thunderbird/kab.aff
PFX W N 1
PFX W 0 w . is:addad_amaruz

# Internal. Last *
PFX b Y 2
PFX b a i/X a is:addad_ilelli
PFX b ta i/X ta is:addad_ilelli

# FS and CS handled in one place
SFX N Y 2
SFX N 0 en/bX . is:mlsg
SFX N 0 en/yX . is:mlsg

# * FS and CS handled in one place
SFX L Y 2
SFX L t en/bX . is:mlsg
SFX L t en/yX . is:mlsg

# Internal. Last *
PFX h Y 2
PFX h ta ti/X ta is:addad_ilelli
PFX h a ti/X a is:addad_ilelli

# Internal *
PFX k Y 1
PFX k a ta/X . is:addad_ilelli

# Internal *
PFX K Y 1
PFX K ta a/X . is:addad_ilelli

# Feminine singular *
SFX t Y 2
SFX t 0 t/kX . is:ntsf
SFX t 0 t/qX . is:ntsf

# Masculine singular, t suffix removal *
SFX l Y 2
SFX l t 0/KX . is:mlsf
SFX l t 0/wX . is:mlsf

PFX e N 6
PFX e ta t ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aeiu] is:addad_amaruz
PFX e ta te ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX e ta te ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX e ti t ti[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aeiu] is:addad_amaruz
PFX e ti te ti[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX e ti te ti[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz

# Could keep these in e, as ta or ti could only match twice with the same meaning. But keep clean.
PFX q Y 12
PFX q ta t/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aeiu] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q ta te/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q ta te/X ta[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q ti t/X ti[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aeiu] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q ti te/X ti[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q ti te/X ti[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q a t/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aeiu] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q a te/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q a te/X a[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q i t/X i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][aeiu] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q i te/X i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz
PFX q i te/X i[bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ][ʷ˚][bcčdḍfgǧhḥjklmnpqrṛsṣtṭvwxyzẓɣɛ] is:addad_amaruz

# * Last 4. For creating regular soft feminine equivalents, only need as circumfix, as vowel reduction
# of word with no final singular t or plural in not needed.
# Such irregular words (hard singular i) or irregular plurals are listed separately, not
# based on lemma.
# Check that feminine strong i words have any regular-looking plural listed separately!

# FS and CS handled in one place
SFX n Y 2
SFX n t in/hX . is:ntsg
SFX n t in/qX . is:ntsg

# * FS and CS handled in one place
# Can't re-use n because it would chop a 't' off the end of a masculine noun
# And because it needs to be separately settable
SFX T Y 2
SFX T 0 in/hX . is:ntsg
SFX T 0 in/qX . is:ntsg

NEEDAFFIX V
FORBIDDENWORD Z
COMPOUNDFLAG J
#COMPOUNDBEGIN S
#COMPOUNDEND L
#COMPOUNDMIDDLE M
ONLYINCOMPOUND O
NOSUGGEST S

ICONV 6
ICONV γ ɣ
ICONV Γ Ɣ
ICONV ε ɛ
ICONV Σ Ɛ
ICONV ° ʷ
ICONV ˚ ʷ
