orthographica/firefox-thunderbird/kab.dic
acu/W po:isem
anwa/W po:tazelɣa
ayen/W po:isem
acuɣer/W po:tazelɣa
acemma/W po:tazelɣa
akal/W
abbaɣ/W po:isem
tibbucin/e po:isem is:asget
abeḍrun/wN po:isem
tabennaṛt/en po:isem
abeqṛaj/wN po:isem
taberkant/en po:isem
taberyuct/en po:isem
tabeṛbuṛt/en po:isem
abeṛjuj/wN po:isem
tabexsist/en po:isem
tabnikt/en po:isem
tabridt/e st:abrid is:NT is:SF
abruy/wN po:isem
tabunayt/en po:isem
abuɛemmaṛ/wN po:isem
tabyirt/en po:isem
tacamet/e po:isem
uccay/W po:isem
acebḥan/wN po:isem
tacemmamt/e st:acemmam is:NT is:SF
acenfir/wN po:isem
taceqquft/en po:isem
acer/W po:isem
ticiwwit/ee st:iciwwi is:NT is:SF
tackumt/en po:isem
ucmit/W po:arbib
acraraq/wN po:isem
ucrik/W po:arbib
tacwawt/en po:isem
udad/W po:isem
tadaxlit/e st:adaxli is:NT is:SF
udayen/W st:uday is:asget
addaden/W st:addad is:asget
adebbuz/wN po:isem
udem/W po:isem
udmawan/W po:isem
tidmi/e po:isem
tadṛujt/en po:isem
adun/W po:isem
adurren/W po:isem is:asget
udɛiyen/W st:udɛi is:asget
aḍajin/wN po:isem
uḍuḍ/W po:isem
taḍwiqt/en po:isem
tafḍiṛt/en po:isem
afellaḥ/wN po:isem
tafelluyt/en po:isem
tiferzizwit/ee st:iferzizwi is:NT is:SF
afeɣnun/wN po:isem
afiẓen/W st:afiẓ is:asget
tifla/e st:tiflit is:asget
taflukt/en po:isem
aftat/wN po:isem
taftilt/en po:isem
uftiyen/W po:isem is:asget
tafuḥant/e st:afuḥan is:NT is:SF
tagdurt/en po:isem
ageccul/wN po:isem
tigeltemt/ee st:igeltem is:NT is:SF
agerdas/wN po:isem
aggus/W po:isem
tigagtin/ee st:igig is:NT is:SG
aglay/wN po:isem
tagrurt/en po:isem
uguren/W st:ugur is:asget
aǧaǧur/wN po:isem
tiǧuztin/e st:taǧuzet is:asget
taḥebbuyt/en po:isem
aḥeckul/wN po:isem
tiḥemmalin/e st:aḥemmal is:NT is:SG
aḥezzaz/wN po:isem
taḥjuṛt/en po:isem
taḥnayt/en po:isem
tajebbant/en po:isem
ajedɛun/wN po:isem
taheyyaft/e po:isem
ajrir/wN po:isem
takawkawt/en po:isem
ukbis/W po:isem
takemmict/e st:akemmic is:NT is:SF
takerrust/en po:isem
akerray/wN po:isem
taksart/e st:aksar is:NT is:SF
takufrart/en po:isem
akuzen/W st:akuz is:asget
aleddad/wN po:arbib
tilellit/ee st:ilelli is:NT is:SF
alexxax/wN po:arbib
alfuɣen/W st:alfuɣ is:asget
talimamt/en po:isem
tiliwa/e po:isem is:asget
allusen/W st:allus is:asget
ulmuten/W st:ulmu is:asget
ulṭacen/W st:ulṭac is:asget
amalay/wN po:isem
timalayin/e st:amalay is:NT is:SG
aman/W po:isem is:asget
amaɣun/wN po:isem
amaziɣ/wN po:isem
tamaziɣt/e st:amaziɣ is:NT is:SF
tamdint/en po:isem
timṭirt/e po:isem
ameččar/wN po:isem
tamehnant/e st:amehnan is:NT is:SF
ameḥṛaṛ/wN po:isem
tamendawt/en po:isem
amendil/wN po:isem
timensit/ee st:imensi is:NT is:SF
amermur/wN po:isem
timeɣṛi/e po:isem
amesrur/wN po:arbib
timexḍit/ee st:imexḍi is:NT is:SF
tameẓwant/en po:isem
ameɛfun/wN po:isem
tamhawt/e st:amhaw is:NT is:SF
amjaḥ/wN po:arbib
umliḥen/W st:umliḥ is:asget
ummilen/W st:ummil is:asget
timnaṛin/e st:amnaṛ is:NT is:SG
timsaysiyin/e st:amsaysi is:NT is:SG
tamsiwt/en po:isem
amsuk/wN po:isem
timuḍinin/e st:amuḍin is:NT is:SG
amzil/wN po:isem
tamẓadt/e st:amẓad is:NT is:SF
umɛin/W po:isem
aneggaḍ/wN po:arbib
taneggarut/e st:aneggaru is:NT is:SF
aneqqir/wN po:isem
ungal/W po:isem
tinifit/e st:inifi is:NT is:SF
anu/W po:isem
apulis/wN po:isem
tapupilt/en po:isem
tiqadusin/e st:aqadus is:NT is:SG
aqaj/W po:isem
aqeclaw/wN po:isem
taqeddarit/e st:aqeddari is:NT is:SF
aqemmar/wN po:isem
tiqerjujin/e st:aqerjuj is:NT is:SG
taqerract/en po:isem
aqerraḍ/wN po:arbib
taqfift/en po:isem
tiqiqbin/e st:tiqibibt is:asget
uqqin/W po:arbib
uqriḍen/W st:uqriḍ is:asget
aqrur/wN po:isem
tiqwirin/e st:aqwir is:NT is:SG
arayan/wN po:isem
tarewwaḥt/en po:isem
areẓ/W po:isem
urizen/W st:uriz is:asget
urqimen/W st:urqim is:asget
arruɣ/W po:isem
tarsast/en po:isem
uruz/W po:isem
aɣamac/wN po:isem
uɣdim/W po:arbib
taɣeggadt/en po:isem
taɣellayt/en po:isem
aɣersiw/wN po:isem
taɣlaft/en po:isem
tiɣlalin /e st:aɣlal is:NT is:SG
tasadift/en po:isem
tisanasin/e st:asanas is:NT is:SG
asarij/wN po:isem
usbiḍ/W po:isem
tasekda/e po:isem
aselkim/wN po:isem
tasellumt/en po:isem
usem/W po:isem
asensul/wN po:isem
taseqqamt/e st:aseqqam is:NT is:SF
tisixiyin/ee st:isixi is:NT is:SG
tasriǧt/en po:isem
ussan/W st:ass is:asget
ussiden/W st:urmir_ussid is:asget
asufen/W st:asuf is:asget
tasumta/e po:isem
aswal/wN po:isem
taṣemmamt/en po:isem
atrar/W po:arbib
aṭeḥṭaḥ/wN po:isem
taṭullift/en po:isem
taweqqayt/en po:isem
tiweɣniwin/e st:taweɣna is:asget
awḥid/wN po:arbib
taxbizt/en po:isem
taxellalt/en po:isem
axemmuj/wN po:isem
taxlalt/e po:isem
axsim/wN po:isem
axuten/W st:axut is:asget
tiyni/e po:isem
ayyawen/W st:ayyaw is:asget
tazaxixt/en po:isem
azeggar/wN po:isem
tazeqqa/e po:isem
azqaq/wN po:isem
tazribt/e st:azrib is:NT is:SF
uzzal/W po:isem
uzɛicen/W st:uzɛic is:asget
aẓenẓar/wN po:isem
tiẓiwect/ee st:iẓiwec is:NT is:SF
taɛebbuḍt/en po:isem
aɛeggun/wN po:arbib
taɛekkurt/e st:aɛekkur is:NT is:SF
taɛezzult/en po:isem
taɛibant/e st:aɛiban is:NT is:SF
aɛwin/wN po:isem
aberrani/wt po:arbib
abninan/wNtT po:arbib
acelhab/wNtT po:arbib
aceɛtan/wNtT po:arbib
aciban/wNtT po:arbib
adal/wNtT po:isem
adda/W po:isem
adeyqan/wNtT po:arbib 
afaci/wt po:arbib
aferɛun/wNtT po:arbib
agejdan/wNtT po:arbib
agrurzan/wNtT po:arbib
agurram/wNtT po:isem
ahendaz/wNtT po:arbib
ahilen/W st:ahil is:asget
ahrawan/wNtT po:arbib
aḥeqqaṛ/wNtT po:arbib
aḥercaw/wNtT po:arbib
ajenṭad/wNtT po:arbib
akemmali/wt po:arbib
aleǧǧam/wNtT po:arbib
alemmas/wNtT po:arbib
aleqqaq/wNtT po:arbib
amagnu/wt po:arbib
amakur/wNtT po:arbib
amaruz/wt po:arbib
amecṭuḥ/wNtT po:arbib
ameḥṛuc/wNtT po:arbib
amejjay/wNtT po:arbib
amejṭuḥ/wNtT po:arbib
amelqaḍ/wNtT po:arbib
amendid/wNtT po:arbib
tamendidt/en po:isem
ameqqran/wNtT po:arbib
ameqqṛan/wNtT po:arbib
amesfaray/wNtT po:arbib
amettan/wNtT po:arbib
ameyyaz/wNtT po:arbib
amezwaru/wt po:arbib
ameẓẓad/wNtT po:arbib
ameɛlal/wNtT po:arbib
amjuṛ/wNtT po:arbib
amsaḥ/wNtT po:arbib
amsebrid/wN po:isem
amudd/W po:isem
amuḍɛif/wNtT po:arbib
amuffir/wNtT po:arbib
aneɣdan/wNtT po:arbib
aneɛmaṛ/wNtT po:arbib
aɣennan/wNtT po:arbib
aɣezfan/wNtT po:arbib
aɣezzfan/wNtT po:arbib
aquran/wNtT po:arbib
arejdal/wNtT po:arbib
arkas/W po:isem
aṛumi/wt po:arbib
asebbaṛ/wNtT po:arbib
asemmaḍ/wNtT po:arbib
tasemmaḍt/en po:isem
asemmam/wNtT po:arbib
taseqqamut/e po:isem
aseṭṭaf/wNtT po:arbib
aseyyaḍ/wNtT po:arbib
aseɛdi/wNtT po:arbib
asusam/wNtT po:arbib
aṭṭanen/W st:aṭṭan is:asget
awerdali/wt po:arbib
awessar/wNtT po:arbib
awezwaz/wNtT po:arbib
awezwaz/wN po:isem
awfayan/wNtT po:arbib
awraɣ/wNtT po:arbib
awṛaɣ/wNtT po:arbib
azeggaɣ/wNtT po:arbib
azegzaw/wNtT po:arbib
azemmar/wNtT po:arbib
aẓayan/wNtT po:arbib
aɛeǧbiw/wNtT po:arbib
aɛezzam/wNtT po:arbib
ibaw/yt po:arbib
akraren/W st:ikerri is:asget
imirḍus/yt po:arbib
tablaḍt/en po:isem
taderwict/en po:isem
tafelwit/e po:isem
tagejdant/en po:isem
taḥcict/en po:isem
tajebbujt/en po:isem
tajmilt/en po:isem
tamaswaḍt/en po:isem
tamencaṛt/en po:isem
tamezwarut/e po:isem
tamnaḍt/en po:isem
tamzazwart/en po:isem
tanezduɣt/en po:isem
taɣeṛmant/en po:isem
taqeṛṛabt/en po:isem
tarrayt/en po:isem
taserdunt/e po:isem 
tasɣaṛt/en po:isem 
tawṛaɣt/en po:isem
tazeɛbaḍt/en po:isem
tizenqatin/e st:tazniqt is:asget
taɛeṣbant/en po:isem
udṛifen/W st:udṛif is:asget
uḥdiqen/W st:uḥdiq is:asget
umuɣ/W po:isem
urgalen/W st:urgal is:asget
uzyin/W po:isem
timsisliyin/e
asekkil/wN po:isem
awalen/W st:awal is:asget
amaddam/wNtT po:arbib is:ml is:sf
afukan/wNtT po:arbib
agafan/wNtT po:arbib
afsaxan/wNtT po:arbib
agaman/wNtT po:arbib
agermazellaw/wNtT po:arbib
agmuḍan/wNtT po:arbib
agraɣlan/wNtT po:arbib
aḥeffaḍ/wNtT po:arbib
akurdac/wNtT po:arbib
amazellawan/wNtT po:arbib
tamesnallunt/en po:isem
afɣafuk/wNtT po:arbib
anitri/wt po:arbib
annayen/W st:annay is:asget
anẓulan/wNtT po:arbib
aṛadyutiliskup/wN po:isem
aslag/wNtT po:arbib
asnallunan/wNtT po:arbib
asfayelwan/wNtT po:arbib
asfayluyan/wNtT po:arbib
agennan/wNtT po:arbib
ahil/W po:isem
ameɛcuq/wNtT po:arbib
aqesḥan/wNtT po:arbib
axemmas/wN po:isem
tacebbakt/en po:isem
tarqaqant/en po:isem
tazebbalt/en po:isem
tazerqaqt/en po:isem
taneɣrimt/en po:isem 
timexlal/e st:tamexlult is:asget
anzaten/W st:anza is:asget
tasmazzaɣt/en po:isem
